Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1224
Limitation of action.

Court action under the provisions of sections 48-1219 to 48-1227 may be commenced no later than four years after the cause of action accrues.

Laws 1969, c. 389, § 6, p. 1369.